Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 1
Powers and Functions of Administrator

§ 28-46-101. Short title. — This chapter shall be known and may be cited as Idaho Credit Code

Administration.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-101, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-102. Applicability.

This part applies to persons who in this state:

Make or solicit regulated consumer credit transactions, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code; or

Directly collect payments from or enforce rights against debtors arising from regulated consumer credit transactions, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code, wherever they are made; or

Are designated in this act as regulated lenders.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-102, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 13, p. 108.

§ 28-46-103. Administrator.

“Administrator” means the director of the department of finance of the state of Idaho.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-103, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-104. Powers of administrator — Reliance on rules — Duty to report.

In addition to other powers granted by this act, the administrator within the limitations provided by law may:

Receive and act on complaints, take action designed to obtain voluntary compliance with this act, or commence proceedings on his own initiative;

Counsel persons and groups on their rights and duties under this act;

Establish programs for the education of debtors with respect to credit practices and problems;

Make studies appropriate to effectuate the purposes and policies of this act and make the results available to the public;

Adopt, amend, and repeal rules to carry out the specific provisions of this act, but not with respect to unconscionable agreements or fraudulent or unconscionable conduct; and

Appoint any necessary attorneys, hearing examiners, clerks, and other employees and agents and fix their compensation, and authorize attorneys appointed under this section to appear for and represent the administrator in court.

In addition to other powers granted by this act, the administrator shall have the power to enforce the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, except to the extent otherwise provided by law.

Except for refund of an excess charge, no liability is imposed under this act for an act done or omitted in conformity with a rule, interpretation, or declaratory ruling of the administrator, notwithstanding that after the act or omission, the rule, interpretation, or ruling is amended or repealed or is determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-104, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-105. Administrative powers with respect to supervised financial organizations.

With respect to supervised financial organizations, the powers of examination and investigation, sections 28-46-106 and 28-46-305, Idaho Code, and administrative enforcement, section 28-46-108, Idaho Code, shall be exercised by the official or agency to whose supervision the organization is subject. All other powers of the administrator under this act may be exercised by him with respect to a supervised financial organization including nationally chartered financial organizations.

If the administrator receives a complaint or other information concerning noncompliance with this act by a supervised financial organization, he shall inform the official or agency having supervisory authority over the organization concerned. The administrator may request information about supervised financial organizations from the officials or agencies supervising them.

The administrator and any official or agency of this state having supervisory authority over a supervised financial organization are authorized and directed to consult and assist one another in maintaining compliance with this act. They may jointly pursue investigations, prosecute suits, and take other official action, as they deem appropriate, if either of them otherwise is empowered to take the action.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-105, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-106. Investigatory powers.

If the administrator has cause to believe that a person has engaged in conduct or committed an act that is subject to action by the administrator, he may make an investigation to determine whether the person has engaged in the conduct or committed the act. To the extent necessary for this purpose, he may administer oaths or affirmations, and, upon his own motion or upon request of any party, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, adduce evidence, and require the production of, or testimony as to, any matter relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any books, documents, or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts, or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence.

If the person’s records are located outside this state, the person at his option shall make them available to the administrator at a convenient location within this state or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the administrator or his representative to examine them where they are located. The administrator may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect them on his behalf.

Upon application by the administrator showing failure without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena or to give testimony, and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the court shall grant an order compelling compliance.

The name or identity of a person whose acts or conduct the administrator investigates pursuant to this section or the facts disclosed in the investigation shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, but this subsection does not apply to disclosures in actions or enforcement proceedings pursuant to this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-106, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 1990, ch. 213, § 24, p. 480; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 48, p. 379.

§ 28-46-107. Application of administrative procedure act.

Except as otherwise provided, the Administrative Procedure Act applies to and governs all administrative action taken by the administrator pursuant to this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-107, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-108. Administrative enforcement orders.

After notice and hearing the administrator may order a creditor or a person acting in his behalf to cease and desist from violating this act. A respondent aggrieved by an order of the administrator may obtain judicial review of the order and the administrator may obtain an order of the court for enforcement of his order in the district court. The proceeding for review or enforcement is initiated by filing a petition in the court. Copies of the petition shall be served upon all parties of record.

Within thirty (30) days after service of the petition for review upon the administrator, or within any further time the court allows, the administrator shall transmit to the court the original or a certified copy of the entire record upon which the order is based, including any transcript of testimony, which need not be printed. By stipulation of all parties to the review proceeding, the record may be shortened. After hearing, the court may:

Reverse or modify the order if the findings of fact of the administrator are clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record;

Grant temporary relief or restraining order it deems just; and

Enter an order enforcing, modifying and enforcing as modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the order of the administrator, or remanding the case to the administrator for further proceedings.

An objection not urged at the hearing shall not be considered by the court unless the failure to urge the objection is excused for good cause shown. A party may move the court to remand the case to the administrator in the interest of justice for the purpose of adducing additional specified and material evidence and seeking findings thereon upon good cause shown for the failure to adduce this evidence before the administrator.

The jurisdiction of the court shall be exclusive and its final judgment or decree is subject to review by the supreme court in the same manner and form and with the same effect as in appeals from a final judgment or decree. The administrator’s copy of the testimony shall be available at reasonable times to all parties for examination without cost.

A proceeding for review under this section shall be initiated within thirty (30) days after a copy of the order of the administrator is received. If no proceeding is so initiated, the administrator may obtain an order of the court for enforcement of his order upon showing that his order was issued in compliance with this section, that no proceeding for review was initiated within thirty (30) days after a copy of the order was received, and that the respondent is subject to the jurisdiction of the court.

With respect to unconscionable agreements or fraudulent or unconscionable conduct by a regulated lender, the administrator may not issue an order pursuant to this section but may bring a civil action for an injunction, section 28-46-111, Idaho Code, or any other action which the administrator is authorized to bring under this act.

With respect to unconscionable agreements or fraudulent or unconscionable conduct by an unlicensed person who is required to be licensed under section 28-46-301, Idaho Code, the administrator may issue a cease and desist order without prior notice or hearing, and may bring a civil action for an injunction, or any other action which the administrator is authorized to bring under this act.
History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-108, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2002, ch. 301, § 4, p. 858; am. 2006, ch. 122, § 4, p. 340.

§ 28-46-109. Assurance of discontinuance.

If it is claimed that a person has engaged in conduct which could be subject to an order by the administrator, sections 28-46-108 and 28-46-303, Idaho Code, or by a court, sections 28-46-110, 28-46-111 and 28-46-112, Idaho Code, the administrator may accept an assurance in writing that the person will not engage in the same or similar conduct in the future. The assurance may include any of the following: stipulations for the voluntary payment by the creditor of the costs of investigation or of an amount to be held in escrow as restitution to debtors aggrieved by past or future conduct of the creditor or to cover costs of future investigation, or admissions of past specific acts by the creditor or that those acts violated this act or other statutes. A violation of an assurance of discontinuance is a violation of this act. If a person giving an assurance of discontinuance fails to comply with its terms, the assurance is evidence that prior to the assurance he engaged in the conduct described in the assurance.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-109, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-110. Injunctions against violations of act.

The administrator may bring a civil action to restrain any person from violating this act and for other appropriate relief including, but not limited to, the following: to prevent a person from using or employing practices prohibited by this act, to reform contracts to conform to this act and to rescind contracts into which a creditor has induced a debtor to enter by conduct violating this act, even though a debtor is not a party to the action. An action under this section may be joined with an action under the provisions on civil actions by the administrator, section 28-46-113, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-110, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-111. Injunctions against unconscionable agreements and fraudulent or unconscionable conduct including debt collection.

The administrator may bring a civil action to restrain a person to whom this part applies from engaging in a course of:

Making or enforcing unconscionable terms or provisions of regulated consumer credit transactions;

Fraudulent or unconscionable conduct in inducing debtors to enter into regulated consumer credit transactions;

Conduct of any of the types specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, with respect to transactions that give rise to or that lead persons to believe will give rise to regulated consumer credit transactions; or

Fraudulent or unconscionable conduct in the collection of debts arising from regulated consumer credit transactions.

In an action brought pursuant to this section, the court may grant relief only if it finds:

That the respondent has made unconscionable agreements or has engaged or is likely to engage in a course of fraudulent or unconscionable conduct;

That the respondent’s agreements have caused or are likely to cause, or the conduct of the respondent has caused or is likely to cause, injury to debtors; and

That the respondent has been able to cause or will be able to cause the injury primarily because the transactions involved are consumer credit transactions.

In applying this section, consideration shall be given to each of the following factors, among others:

Belief by the creditor at the time regulated consumer credit transactions are made that there was no reasonable probability of payment in full of the obligation by the debtor;

In the case of regulated consumer credit sales, knowledge by the seller at the time of the sale of the inability of the buyer to receive substantial benefits from the property or services sold;

In the case of regulated consumer credit sales, gross disparity between the price of the property or services sold and the value of the property or services measured by the price at which similar property or services are readily obtainable in credit transactions by like buyers;

The fact that the creditor contracted for or received separate charges for insurance with respect to regulated consumer credit sales or regulated consumer loans with the effect of making the sales or loans, considered as a whole, unconscionable; and

The fact that the respondent has knowingly taken advantage of the inability of the debtor reasonably to protect his interests by reason of physical or mental infirmities, ignorance, illiteracy or inability to understand the language of the agreement, or similar factors.

In an action brought pursuant to this section, a charge or practice expressly permitted by this act is not in itself unconscionable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-111, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-112. Temporary relief.

With respect to an action brought to enjoin violations of the act, section 28-46-110, Idaho Code, or unconscionable agreements or fraudulent or unconscionable conduct, section 28-46-111, Idaho Code, the administrator may apply to the court for appropriate temporary relief against a respondent, pending final determination of proceedings. If the court finds after a hearing held upon notice to the respondent that there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent is engaging in or is likely to engage in conduct sought to be restrained, it may grant any temporary relief or restraining order it deems appropriate.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-112, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-113. Civil actions by administrator.

After demand, the administrator may bring a civil action against a creditor to recover actual damages sustained and excess charges paid by one (1) or more debtors who have a right to recover explicitly granted by this act. In a civil action under this subsection, penalties may not be recovered by the administrator. The court shall order amounts recovered under this subsection to be paid to each debtor or set off against his obligation. A debtor’s action, except a class action, takes precedence over a prior or subsequent action by the administrator with respect to the claim of that debtor. A debtor’s class action takes precedence over a subsequent action by the administrator with respect to claims common to both actions, but the administrator may intervene. An administrator’s action on behalf of a class of debtors takes precedence over a debtor’s subsequent class action with respect to claims common to both actions. Whenever an action takes precedence over another action under this subsection, the latter action may be stayed to the extent appropriate while the precedent action is pending and dismissed if the precedent action is dismissed with prejudice or results in a final judgment granting or denying the claim asserted in the precedent action. A defense available to a creditor in a civil action brought by a debtor is available to him in a civil action brought under this subsection.

The administrator may bring a civil action against a creditor or a person acting in his behalf to recover a civil penalty of no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for repeatedly and intentionally violating this act. A civil penalty pursuant to this subsection may not be imposed for a violation of this act occurring more than two (2) years before the action is brought.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-113, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2002, ch. 301, § 5, p. 858; am. 2006, ch. 122, § 5, p. 340.

§ 28-46-114. Jury trial.

The administrator has no right to trial by jury in an action brought by him under this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-114, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-115. Debtors’ remedies not affected.

The grant of powers to the administrator in this chapter does not affect remedies available to debtors under this act or under other principles of law or equity.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-115, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-46-116. Venue.

The administrator may bring actions or proceedings in a court in a county in which an act on which the action or proceeding is based occurred or in a county in which the respondent resides or transacts business.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-116, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.